Rhode Island, session 2025, SB251.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-41.1 of the General Laws entitled "Adjudication of Traffic
Offenses" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-41.1-4.1. Limitation on collection of motor vehicle violation fines.
Notwithstanding any general law, rule or regulation to the contrary, no fines and/or costs
assessed as a result of a motor vehicle violation(s) of title 31 may be collected against the motorist
responsible for the violation by the state, any municipality or a court, more than seven (7) years
after the violation fine and/or cost became final and unappealable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000373
========